Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.095

Bylaws.

The initial bylaws of a corporation shall be adopted by its board of directors. The power to alter, amend or repeal the bylaws or adopt new bylaws shall be vested in the board of directors unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or the bylaws. The bylaws may contain any provisions for the regulation and management of the affairs of a corporation not inconsistent with law or the articles of incorporation: PROVIDED, That where the bylaws of an existing corporation prohibit voting by mail, by electronic transmission, or by proxy or attorney-in-fact, and the quorum required by its bylaws for election of directors or transaction of other business has not been obtained at a shareholders' or members' meeting, for a period which includes at least two consecutive annual meeting dates, the board of directors shall have power to amend such bylaws to thereafter authorize voting by mail, by electronic transmission, or by proxy or attorney-in-fact.

[ 2000 c 167 s 2; 1970 ex.s. c 78 s 1; 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 19.]